Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.300

Return of parole violators from another state—Contracts to share costs.

The secretary, upon recommendation by the board, may enter into contracts with similar officials of any other state or states for the purpose of sharing an equitable portion of the cost of effecting the return of any person who has violated the terms and conditions of parole, probation, or community custody as granted by this state.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 21; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 346; 1999 c 143 s 32; 1955 c 183 s 3.]

NOTES:

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.